Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.030

Definitions. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Entity" includes every state office, department, board, commission, unit or subunit, and agency of the state, and where provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state agency. "Entity" also includes any part of the Revised Code of Washington scheduled for repeal, expiration, or program termination.

(2) "Person" includes every natural person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or organization.

[ 2000 c 189 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 3.]